Utah statutes.
31A-22-1803.   Licensure required.

(1)  Subject to Subsection 31A-22-1804(2) and Section 31A-23a-103, a vendor is required to hold a portable electronics limited lines license to sell or offer coverage under a portable electronics insurance policy.

(2)  A portable electronics limited lines license issued under this section authorizes an employee or authorized representative of the vendor to sell or offer coverage under a portable electronics insurance policy to a customer at each location at which the vendor who holds the limited lines license engages in portable electronics transactions.

(3)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a limited lines license issued under this section authorizes the licensee and the licensee's employees or authorized representatives to engage in those activities that are permitted by this section.

(4)  A supervising entity shall maintain a registry of vendor locations at which the vendor is authorized to sell or offer portable electronics insurance coverage in this state.  Upon request by the commissioner and with three business days notice to the supervising entity, the supervising entity shall make the registry open to inspection and examination by the commissioner during regular business hours of the supervising entity.

